Utah statutes.
20A-1-509.   Definitions applicable to Sections 20A-1-509.1, 20A-1-509.2,
and 20A-1-509.3.
As used in Sections 20A-1-509.1, 20A-1-509.2, and 20A-1-509.3:
(1)  "County clerk" means:
(a)  for a single county, the county clerk of that county; and
(b)  for a prosecution district, the county clerk of the most populous county
within the prosecution district.
(2)  "County legislative body" includes each legislative body with the power
to participate in the selection of a district attorney as provided in the
interlocal prosecution district agreement.
